Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2966
Waiver of notice of meeting.

(1) Unless otherwise provided in the articles of organization or bylaws, a director may waive any required notice of a meeting of the board of directors in a record before, during, or after the meeting.

(2) Unless otherwise provided in the articles of organization or bylaws, a director's participation in a meeting is waiver of notice of that meeting, unless the director objects to the meeting at the beginning of the meeting or promptly upon the director's arrival at the meeting and does not thereafter vote for or assent to action taken at the meeting.

Laws 2007, LB368, § 66.